Illinois, session 104th, HB2923.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Police Training Act is amended by 5changing Section 9.2 as follows: 6    (50 ILCS 705/9.2)7    Sec. 9.2. Officer professional conduct database; 8transparency.9    (a) All law enforcement agencies and the Illinois State 10Police shall notify the Board of any final determination of a 11willful violation of department, agency, or the Illinois State 12Police policy, official misconduct, or violation of law within 1310 days when:14        (1) the determination leads to a suspension of at 15    least 10 days;16        (2) any infraction that would trigger an official or 17    formal investigation under a law enforcement agency or the 18    Illinois State Police policy;19        (3) there is an allegation of misconduct or regarding 20    truthfulness as to a material fact, bias, or integrity; or21        (4) the officer resigns or retires during the course 22    of an investigation and the officer has been served notice 23    that the officer is under investigation.  HB2923- 2 -LRB104 05548 RTM 15578 b1    Agencies and the Illinois State Police may report to the 2Board any conduct they deem appropriate to disseminate to 3another law enforcement agency regarding a law enforcement 4officer.5    The agency or the Illinois State Police shall report to 6the Board within 10 days of a final determination and final 7exhaustion of any administrative appeal, or the law 8enforcement officer's resignation or retirement, and shall 9provide information regarding the nature of the violation. 10This notification shall not necessarily trigger certification 11review.12    If a law enforcement agency fails to comply with this 13subsection, then the chief administrator of the law 14enforcement agency may be brought before the Certification 15Review Panel. Upon a recommendation of the Certification 16Review Panel, the Board may suspend the chief administrator's 17law enforcement certification for a period of no less than 30 18days. The Board may bring a discretionary decertification 19action under Section 6.3 against the chief administrator for a 20second or subsequent violation of this subsection. 21    A law enforcement agency and the Illinois State Police 22shall be immune from liability for a disclosure made as 23described in this subsection, unless the disclosure would 24constitute intentional misrepresentation or gross negligence.25    (b) Within 14 days after receiving notification from a law 26enforcement agency or the Illinois State Police, the Board   HB2923- 3 -LRB104 05548 RTM 15578 b1must notify the law enforcement officer of the report and the 2officer's right to provide a statement regarding the reported 3violation. The law enforcement officer shall have 14 days from 4receiving notice to provide a written objection contesting 5information included in the agency's report. The objection 6must be filed with the Board on a form prescribed by the Board 7and a copy must be served on the law enforcement agency. The 8objection shall remain in the database with the reported 9violation. 10    (c) The Board shall maintain a database readily available 11to any chief administrative officer, or the officer's 12designee, of a law enforcement agency and the Illinois State 13Police that shall show for each law enforcement officer: (i) 14dates of certification, decertification, and inactive status; 15(ii) each sustained instance of departmental misconduct that 16lead to a suspension at least 10 days or any infraction that 17would trigger an official or formal investigation under the 18law enforcement agency policy, any allegation of misconduct 19regarding truthfulness as to a material fact, bias, or 20integrity, or any other reported violation, the nature of the 21violation, the reason for the final decision of discharge or 22dismissal, and any statement provided by the officer; (iii) 23date of separation from employment from any local or state law 24enforcement agency; (iv) the reason for separation from 25employment, including, but not limited to: whether the 26separation was based on misconduct or occurred while the law   HB2923- 4 -LRB104 05548 RTM 15578 b1enforcement agency was conducting an investigation of the 2certified individual for a violation of an employing agency's 3rules, policy or procedure or other misconduct or improper 4action.5        (1) This database shall also be accessible to the 6    State's Attorney of any county in this State and the 7    Attorney General for the purpose of complying with 8    obligations under Brady v. Maryland (373 U.S. 83) or 9    Giglio v. United States (405 U.S. 150). This database 10    shall also be accessible to the chief administrative 11    officer of any law enforcement agency for the purposes of 12    hiring law enforcement officers. This database shall not 13    be accessible to anyone not listed in this subsection.14        (2) Before a law enforcement agency may appoint a law 15    enforcement officer or a person seeking a certification as 16    a law enforcement officer in this State, the chief 17    administrative officer or designee must check the Officer 18    Professional Conduct Database, contact each person's 19    previous law enforcement employers, and document the 20    contact. This documentation must be available for review 21    by the Board for a minimum of five years after the law 22    enforcement officer's termination, retirement, 23    resignation or separation with that agency.24        (3) The database, documents, materials, or other 25    information in the possession or control of the Board that 26    are obtained by or disclosed to the Board under this   HB2923- 5 -LRB104 05548 RTM 15578 b1    subsection shall be confidential by law and privileged, 2    shall not be subject to subpoena, and shall not be subject 3    to discovery or admissible in evidence in any private 4    civil action when sought from the Board. However, the 5    Board is authorized to use such documents, materials, or 6    other information in furtherance of any regulatory or 7    legal action brought as part of the Board's official 8    duties. The Board shall not disclose the database or make 9    such documents, materials, or other information it has 10    obtained or that has been disclosed to it to the public. 11    Neither the Board nor any person who received documents, 12    materials or other information shared under this 13    subsection shall be required to testify in any private 14    civil action concerning the database or any confidential 15    documents, materials, or information subject to this 16    subsection.17    (d) The Board shall maintain a searchable database of law 18enforcement officers accessible to the public that shall 19include: (i) the law enforcement officer's employing agency; 20(ii) the date of the officer's initial certification and the 21officer's current certification status; and (iii) any 22sustained complaint of misconduct that resulted in 23decertification and the date thereof; provided, however, that 24information shall not be included in the database that would 25allow the public to ascertain the home address of an officer or 26another person; provided further, that information regarding   HB2923- 6 -LRB104 05548 RTM 15578 b1an officer's or another person's family member shall not be 2included in the database. The Board shall make the database 3publicly available on its website.4    (e) The Board shall maintain a searchable database of all 5completed investigations against law enforcement officers 6related to decertification. The database shall identify each 7law enforcement officer by a confidential and anonymous number 8and include: (i) the law enforcement officer's employing 9agency; (ii) the date of the incident referenced in the 10complaint; (iii) the location of the incident; (iv) the race 11and ethnicity of each officer involved in the incident; (v) 12the age, gender, race and ethnicity of each person involved in 13the incident, if known; (vi) whether a person in the 14complaint, including a law enforcement officer, was injured, 15received emergency medical care, was hospitalized or died as a 16result of the incident; (vii) the law enforcement agency or 17other entity assigned to conduct an investigation of the 18incident; (viii) when the investigation was completed; (ix) 19whether the complaint was sustained; and (x) the type of 20misconduct investigated; provided, however, that the Board 21shall redact or withhold such information as necessary to 22prevent the disclosure of the identity of an officer. The 23Board shall make the database publicly available on its 24website.25    (e-1) An investigation is complete when the investigation 26has either been terminated or the decertification action,   HB2923- 7 -LRB104 05548 RTM 15578 b1including the administrative review process, has been 2completed, whichever is later.3    (e-2) At any time, a law enforcement officer shall have 4access to the law enforcement officer's own records on file 5with the Board, as it pertains to the databases in this 6Section. 7    (f) Annual report. The Board shall submit an annual report 8to the Governor, Attorney General, President and Minority 9Leader of the Senate, and the Speaker and Minority Leader of 10the House of Representatives on or before March 1, 2023, and 11every year thereafter indicating:12        (1) the number of complaints received in the preceding 13    calendar year, including but not limited to the race, 14    gender, and type of discretionary decertification 15    complaints received;16        (2) the number of investigations initiated in the 17    preceding calendar year since the date of the last report;18        (3) the number of investigations concluded in the 19    preceding calendar year;20        (4) the number of investigations pending as of the 21    last date of the preceding calendar year;22        (5) the number of hearings held in the preceding 23    calendar year; and24        (6) the number of officers decertified in the 25    preceding calendar year.26    The annual report shall be publicly available on the   HB2923- 8 -LRB104 05548 RTM 15578 b1website of the Board. 2    (g) Nothing in this Section shall exempt a law enforcement 3agency from which the Board has obtained data, documents, 4materials, or other information or that has disclosed data, 5documents, materials, or other information to the Board from 6disclosing public records in accordance with the Freedom of 7Information Act.8    (h) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 9the changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act of the 10102nd General Assembly and Public Act 101-652 take effect July 111, 2022. 12(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-22; 102-694, eff. 1-7-22.) 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.